California statutes. Insurance Code
(B) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B.

(C) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C.

(D) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D.

(E) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan E shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized
 Medicare benefit plan D.

(F) (i) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare benefit plan F.

(ii) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F.

(G) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G.

(H) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan H shall be
 deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D.

(I) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan I shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G.

(J) (i) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan J shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F.

(ii) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan J shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F.

(K) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K.

(L) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L.

(M) New or innovative benefits, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 10192.9 and subdivision (f) of Section 10192.91, shall not be included when determining whether benefits are equal to or lesser than those provided by the previous coverage.

(i) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section upon being
 notified that, because of an increase in the individual’s income or assets, they meet one of the following requirements:

(1) They are no longer eligible for Medi-Cal benefits.

(2) They are only eligible for Medi-Cal benefits with a share of cost and certifies at the time of application that they have not met the share of cost.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 157, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 549, Sec. 4.   (SB 407)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.12.

(a) (1) With respect to the guaranteed issue of a Medicare supplement policy, eligible persons are those individuals described in subdivision (b) who seek to enroll under the policy during the period specified in subdivision (c), and who submit evidence of the date of termination or disenrollment or enrollment in Medicare Part D with the application for a Medicare supplement
 policy.

(2) With respect to eligible persons, an issuer shall not take any of the following actions:

(A) Deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of a Medicare supplement policy described in subdivision (e) that is offered and is available for issuance to new enrollees by the issuer.

(B) Discriminate in the pricing of that Medicare supplement policy because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition.

(C) Impose an exclusion of benefits based on a preexisting condition under that Medicare supplement policy.

(b) An eligible person is an individual described in any of the following paragraphs:

(1) The individual is enrolled under an employee welfare benefit plan that provides health benefits that supplement the benefits under Medicare and either of the following applies:

(A) The plan either terminates or ceases to provide all of those supplemental health benefits to the individual.

(B) The employer no longer provides the individual with insurance that covers all of the payment for the 20-percent coinsurance.

(2) The individual is enrolled with a Medicare Advantage organization under a Medicare Advantage plan under Medicare Part C, and any of the following circumstances apply:

(A) The certification of the organization or plan has been terminated.

(B) The organization
 has terminated or otherwise discontinued providing the plan in the area in which the individual resides.

(C) The individual is no longer eligible to elect the plan because of a change in the individual’s place of residence or other change in circumstances specified by the secretary. Those changes in circumstances shall not include termination of the individual’s enrollment on the basis described in Section 1851(g)(3)(B) of the federal Social Security Act where the individual has not paid premiums on a timely basis or has engaged in disruptive behavior as specified in standards under Section 1856 of the federal Social Security Act, or the plan is terminated for all individuals within a residence area.

(D) (i) The Medicare Advantage plan in which the individual is enrolled reduces any of its benefits or increases the amount of cost sharing or premium or
 discontinues for other than good cause relating to quality of care its relationship or contract under the plan with a provider who is currently furnishing services to the individual. An individual shall be eligible under this subparagraph for a Medicare supplement policy issued by the same issuer through which the individual was enrolled at the time the reduction, increase, or discontinuance described above occurs or, commencing January 1, 2007, for one issued by a subsidiary of the parent company of that issuer or by a network that contracts with the parent company of that issuer. If no Medicare supplement policy is available to the individual from the same issuer, a subsidiary of the parent company of the issuer, or a network that contracts with the parent company of the issuer, the individual shall be eligible for a Medicare supplement policy pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) issued by any issuer, if the Medicare Advantage plan in which the individual is enrolled does any of the following:

(I) Increases the premium by 15 percent or more.

(II) Increases physician, hospital, or drug copayments by 15 percent or more.

(III) Reduces any benefits under the plan.

(IV) Discontinues, for other than good cause relating to quality of care, its relationship or contract under the plan with a provider who is currently furnishing services to the individual.

(ii) Enrollment in a Medicare supplement policy from an issuer unaffiliated with the issuer of the Medicare Advantage plan in which the individual is enrolled shall be permitted only during the annual election period for a Medicare Advantage plan, except where the Medicare Advantage plan has discontinued its relationship with a provider
 currently furnishing services to the individual. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an individual to enroll in a group Medicare supplement policy if the individual does not meet the eligibility requirements for the group.

(E) The individual demonstrates, in accordance with guidelines established by the secretary, either of the following:

(i) The organization offering the plan substantially violated a material provision of the organization’s contract under this article in relation to the individual, including the failure to provide on a timely basis medically necessary care for which benefits are available under the plan or the failure to provide the covered care in accordance with applicable quality standards.

(ii) The organization, or agent or other entity acting on the organization’s behalf,
 materially misrepresented the plan’s provisions in marketing the plan to the individual.

(F) The individual meets other exceptional conditions as the secretary may provide.

(3) The individual is 65 years of age or older, is enrolled with a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) provider under Section 1894 of the federal Social Security Act, and circumstances similar to those described in paragraph (2) exist that would permit discontinuance of the individual’s enrollment with the provider, if the individual were enrolled in a Medicare Advantage plan.

(4) The individual meets both of the following conditions:

(A) The individual is enrolled with any of the following:

(i) An
 eligible organization under a contract under Section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act (Medicare cost).

(ii) A similar organization operating under demonstration project authority, effective for periods before April 1, 1999.

(iii) An organization under an agreement under Section 1833(a)(1)(A) of the federal Social Security Act (health care prepayment plan).

(iv) An organization under a Medicare Select policy.

(B) The enrollment ceases under the same circumstances that would permit discontinuance of an individual’s election of coverage under paragraph (2) or (3).

(5) The individual is enrolled under a Medicare supplement policy, and the enrollment ceases because of any of the
 following circumstances:

(A) The insolvency of the issuer or bankruptcy of the nonissuer organization, or other involuntary termination of coverage or enrollment under the policy.

(B) The issuer of the policy substantially violated a material provision of the policy.

(C) The issuer, or an agent or other entity acting on the issuer’s behalf, materially misrepresented the policy’s provisions in marketing the policy to the individual.

(6) The individual meets both of the following conditions:

(A) The individual was enrolled under a Medicare supplement policy and terminates enrollment and subsequently enrolls, for the first time, with any Medicare Advantage organization under a Medicare
 Advantage plan under Medicare Part C, any eligible organization under a contract under Section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act (Medicare cost), any similar organization operating under demonstration project authority, any PACE provider under Section 1894 of the federal Social Security Act, or a Medicare Select policy.

(B) The subsequent enrollment under subparagraph (A) is terminated by the individual during any period within the first 12 months of the subsequent enrollment (during which the enrollee is permitted to terminate the subsequent enrollment under Section 1851(e) of the federal Social Security Act).

(7) The individual upon first becoming eligible for benefits under Medicare Part A at 65 years of age enrolls in a Medicare Advantage plan under Medicare Part C or with a PACE provider under Section 1894 of the federal Social Security Act, and disenrolls from the plan
 or program not later than 12 months after the effective date of enrollment.

(8) The individual while enrolled under a Medicare supplement policy that covers outpatient prescription drugs enrolls in a Medicare Part D plan during the initial enrollment period terminates enrollment in the Medicare supplement policy, and submits evidence of enrollment in Medicare Part D along with the application for a policy described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (e).

(c) (1) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the guaranteed issue period begins on the later of the following two dates and ends on the date that is 63 days after the date the applicable coverage terminates:

(A) The date the individual receives a notice of termination or cessation of all supplemental health
 benefits or, if no notice is received, the date of the notice denying a claim because of a termination or cessation of benefits.

(B) The date that the applicable coverage terminates or ceases.

(2) In the case of an individual described in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (6), and (7) of subdivision (b) whose enrollment is terminated involuntarily, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date that the individual receives a notice of termination and ends 63 days after the date the applicable coverage is terminated.

(3) In the case of an individual described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), the guaranteed issue period begins on the earlier of the following two dates and ends on the date that is 63 days after the date the coverage is terminated:

(A) The date that the individual receives a notice of termination, a notice of the issuer’s bankruptcy or insolvency, or other similar notice if any.

(B) The date that the applicable coverage is terminated.

(4) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (2), (3), (6), or (7) of, or in subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (5) of, subdivision (b) who disenrolls voluntarily, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date that is 60 days before the effective date of the disenrollment and ends on the date that is 63 days after the effective date of the disenrollment.

(5) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b), the guaranteed issue period begins on the date the individual receives notice pursuant to Section 1882(v)(2)(B)
 of the federal Social Security Act from the Medicare supplement issuer during the 60-day period immediately preceding the initial enrollment period for Medicare Part D and ends on the date that is 63 days after the effective date of the individual’s coverage under Medicare Part D.

(6) In the case of an individual described in subdivision (b) who is not included in this subdivision, the guaranteed issue period begins on the effective date of disenrollment and ends on the date that is 63 days after the effective date of disenrollment.

(d) (1) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), or deemed to be so described pursuant to this paragraph, whose enrollment with an organization or provider described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) is involuntarily terminated within the first 12 months of enrollment and
 who, without an intervening enrollment, enrolls with another such organization or provider, the subsequent enrollment shall be deemed to be an initial enrollment described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b).

(2) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), or deemed to be so described pursuant to this paragraph, whose enrollment with a plan or in a program described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) is involuntarily terminated within the first 12 months of enrollment and who, without an intervening enrollment, enrolls in another such plan or program, the subsequent enrollment shall be deemed to be an initial enrollment described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b).

(3) For purposes of paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (b), an enrollment of an individual with an organization or provider described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of
 subdivision (b), or with a plan or in a program described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) shall not be deemed to be an initial enrollment under this paragraph after the two-year period beginning on the date on which the individual first enrolled with such an organization, provider, plan, or program.

(e) (1) Under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (b), an eligible individual is entitled to a Medicare supplement policy that has a benefit package classified as Plan A, B, C, F (including a high deductible Plan F), K, L, M, or N offered by any issuer.

(2) (A) Under paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), an eligible individual is entitled to the same Medicare supplement policy in which he or she was most recently enrolled, if available from the same issuer. If that policy is not available, the eligible individual is entitled
 to a Medicare supplement policy that has a benefit package classified as Plan A, B, C, F (including a high deductible Plan F), K, L, M, or N offered by any issuer.

(B) On and after January 1, 2006, an eligible individual described in this paragraph who was most recently enrolled in a Medicare supplement policy with an outpatient prescription drug benefit is entitled to a Medicare supplement policy that is available from the same issuer but without an outpatient prescription drug benefit or, at the election of the individual, has a benefit package classified as a Plan A, B, C, F (including high deductible Plan F), K, L, M, or N that is offered by any issuer.

(3) Under paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), an eligible individual is entitled to any Medicare supplement policy offered by any issuer.

(4) Under paragraph (8) of
 subdivision (b), an eligible individual is entitled to a Medicare supplement policy that has a benefit package classified as Plan A, B, C, F (including a high deductible Plan F), K, L, M, or N and that is offered and is available for issuance to a new enrollee by the same issuer that issued the individual’s Medicare supplement policy with outpatient prescription drug coverage.

(f) (1) At the time of an event described in subdivision (b) by which an individual loses coverage or benefits due to the termination of a contract or agreement, policy, or plan, the organization that terminates the contract or agreement, the issuer terminating the policy, or the administrator of the plan being terminated, respectively, shall notify the individual of his or her rights under this section and of the obligations of issuers of Medicare supplement policies under subdivision (a). The notice shall be communicated contemporaneously with the
 notification of termination.

(2) At the time of an event described in subdivision (b) by which an individual ceases enrollment under a contract or agreement, policy, or plan, the organization that offers the contract or agreement, regardless of the basis for the cessation of enrollment, the issuer offering the policy, or the administrator of the plan, respectively, shall notify the individual of his or her rights under this section, and of the obligations of issuers of Medicare supplement policies under subdivision (a). The notice shall be communicated within 10 working days of the date the issuer received notification of disenrollment.

(g) An issuer shall refund any unearned premium that an insured paid in advance and shall terminate coverage upon the request of an insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 113.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.13.

(a) An issuer shall comply with Section 1882(c)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (as enacted by Section 4081(b)(2)(C) of the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (OBRA), Public Law 100-203) by doing all of the following and by certifying compliance on the Medicare supplement insurance experience reporting form:

(1) Accepting a notice from a Medicare Administrative Contractor, formerly known as a fiscal intermediary or carrier, on dually assigned claims
 submitted by participating physicians and suppliers as a claim for benefits in place of any other claim form otherwise required and making a payment determination on the basis of the information contained in that notice.

(2) Notifying the participating physician or supplier and the beneficiary of the payment determination.

(3) Paying the participating physician or supplier directly.

(4) Furnishing, at the time of enrollment, each enrollee with a card listing the policy name, number, and a central mailing address to which notices from Medicare Administrative Contractors may be sent.

(5) Paying user fees for claim notices that are transmitted electronically or otherwise.

(6) Providing to the
 secretary, at least annually, a central mailing address to which all claims may be sent by Medicare Administrative Contractors.

(7) File, by June 30 of each year, with the commissioner a list of its Medicare supplement policies and certificates offered or issued or in force in California as of the end of the previous year.

(A) The list shall identify the issuer by name and address, shall identify each type of form it offers by name and form number, and shall differentiate between forms approved in the previous calendar year and those approved before the previous calendar year.

(B) The list shall identify all of the following:

(i) Forms issued and in force but no longer offered in California.

(ii) Forms that, for any reason, were not filed and approved by the commissioner.

(iii) Forms for which the commissioner’s approval was withdrawn within the previous calendar year.

(iv) The number of forms issued in California in the previous calendar year, and the number of forms in force in California on December 31 of the previous calendar year.

(b) (1) Compliance with the requirements set forth in subdivision (a) shall be certified on the Medicare supplement insurance experience reporting form provided by the commissioner.

(2) The commissioner shall, by September 1 of each year, provide the secretary with a list identifying each issuer by name and address and provide the information requested in this section.

(c) No issuer that administers Medicare coverage and federal employee programs may require that more than one form be submitted per claim in order to receive payment or reimbursement under any or all of those policies or programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 10, Sec. 23.   Effective July 2, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.14.

(a) (1) (A) With respect to loss ratio standards, a Medicare supplement policy form or certificate form shall not be advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery unless the policy form or certificate form can be expected, as estimated for the entire period for which rates are computed to provide coverage, to return to policyholders and certificate holders in the form of aggregate benefits, not including anticipated refunds or credits, provided under the policy form or certificate form at least
 75 percent of the aggregate amount of premiums earned in the case of group policies, or at least 65 percent of the aggregate amount of premiums earned in the case of individual policies.

(B) Loss ratio standards shall be calculated on the basis of incurred claims experience, and earned premiums shall be calculated for the period and in accordance with accepted actuarial principles and practices.

(2) All filings of rates and rating schedules shall demonstrate that expected claims in relation to premiums comply with the requirements of this section when combined with actual experience to date. Filings of rate revisions shall also demonstrate that the anticipated loss ratio over the entire future period for which the revised rates are computed to provide coverage can be expected to meet the appropriate loss ratio standards.

(3) For purposes of applying paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 10192.15 only, policies issued as a result of solicitations of individuals through the mail or by mass media advertising, including both print and broadcast advertising, shall be deemed to be individual policies.

(b) (1) With respect to refund or credit calculations, an issuer shall collect and file with the commissioner by May 31 of each year the data contained in the applicable reporting form required by the commissioner for each type of coverage in a standard Medicare supplement benefit plan.

(2) If on the basis of the experience as reported the benchmark ratio since inception (ratio 1) exceeds the adjusted experience ratio since inception (ratio 3), then a refund or credit calculation is required. The refund calculation shall be done
 on a statewide basis for each type in a standard Medicare supplement benefit plan. For purposes of the refund or credit calculation, experience on policies issued within the reporting year shall be excluded.

(3) For the purposes of this section, with respect to policies or certificates advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery prior to January 1, 2001, the issuer shall make the refund or credit calculation separately for all individual policies, including all group policies subject to an individual loss ratio standard when issued, combined and all other group policies combined for experience after January 1, 2001. The first report pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be due by May 31, 2003.

(4) A refund or credit shall be made only when the benchmark loss ratio exceeds the adjusted experience loss ratio and the amount to be refunded or credited exceeds a de minimis level. The
 refund shall include interest from the end of the calendar year to the date of the refund or credit at a rate specified by the secretary, but in no event shall it be less than the average rate of interest for 13-week Treasury notes. A refund or credit against premiums due shall be made by September 30 following the experience year upon which the refund or credit is based.

(c) An issuer of Medicare supplement policies and certificates shall file annually its rates, rating schedule, and supporting documentation including ratios of incurred losses to earned premiums by policy duration for approval by the commissioner in accordance with the filing requirements and procedures prescribed by the commissioner and this code. The supporting documentation shall also demonstrate in accordance with actuarial standards of practice using reasonable assumptions that the appropriate loss ratio standards can be expected to be met over the entire period for which
 rates are computed. The demonstration shall exclude active life reserves. An expected third-year loss ratio that is greater than or equal to the applicable percentage shall be demonstrated for policies or certificates in force less than three years.

As soon as practicable, but prior to the effective date of enhancements in Medicare benefits, every issuer of Medicare supplement policies or certificates shall file with the commissioner, in accordance with applicable filing procedures, all of the following:

(1) (A) Appropriate premium adjustments necessary to produce loss ratios as anticipated for the current premium for the applicable policies or certificates. The supporting documents necessary to justify the adjustment shall accompany the filing.

(B) An issuer shall make premium adjustments necessary to produce an
 expected loss ratio under the policy or certificate to conform to minimum loss ratio standards for Medicare supplement policies and that are expected to result in a loss ratio at least as great as that originally anticipated in the rates used to produce current premiums by the issuer for the Medicare supplement policies or certificates. No premium adjustment that would modify the loss ratio experience under the policy other than the adjustments described in this section shall be made with respect to a policy at any time other than upon its renewal date or anniversary date.

(C) If an issuer fails to make premium adjustments acceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may order premium adjustments, refunds, or premium credits deemed necessary to achieve the loss ratio required by this section.

(2) Any appropriate riders, endorsements, or policy forms needed to accomplish the
 Medicare supplement policy or certificate modifications necessary to eliminate benefit duplications with Medicare. The riders, endorsements, or policy forms shall provide a clear description of the Medicare supplement benefits provided by the policy or certificate.

(d) The commissioner may conduct a public hearing to gather information concerning a request by an issuer for an increase in a rate for a policy form or certificate form issued before or after the effective date of January 1, 2001, if the experience of the form for the previous reporting period is not in compliance with the applicable loss ratio standard. The determination of compliance is made without consideration of any refund or credit for the reporting period. Public notice of the hearing shall be furnished in a manner deemed appropriate by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 206, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.15.

(a) An issuer shall not advertise, solicit, or issue for delivery a policy or certificate to a resident of this state unless the policy form or certificate form has been filed with and approved by the commissioner in accordance with filing requirements and procedures prescribed by the commissioner. Master policies issued outside California shall be filed for informational purposes along with the certificates. Until January 1, 2001, or 90 days after approval of Medicare supplement policies or certificates submitted for approval pursuant to
 this section, whichever is later, issuers may continue to offer and market previously approved Medicare supplement policies or certificates.

(b) An issuer shall file any riders or amendments to policy or certificate forms to delete outpatient prescription drug benefits, as required by the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (P.L. 108-173), only with the commissioner in the state where the policy or certificate was issued.

(c) (1) An issuer shall not use or change premium rates for a Medicare supplement policy or certificate unless the rates, rating schedule, and supporting documentation have been filed with and approved by the commissioner in accordance with the filing requirements and procedures prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 10290 shall not apply to Medicare supplement insurance forms or rates. However, the commissioner may authorize in writing, for good cause only, the limited use of a form or rates after that form or the rates have been filed with the commissioner for 60 days and have not otherwise been acted upon.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an issuer shall not file for approval more than one form of a policy or certificate of each type for each standard Medicare supplement benefit plan.

(2) An issuer may offer, with the approval of the commissioner, up to four additional policy forms or certificate forms of the same type for the same standard Medicare supplement benefit plan, one for each of the following cases:

(A) The inclusion of new or innovative benefits.

(B) The addition of either direct response or agent marketing methods.

(C) The addition of either guaranteed issue or underwritten coverage.

(D) The offering of coverage to individuals eligible for Medicare by reason of disability.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a “type” means an individual policy, a group policy, an individual Medicare Select policy, or a group Medicare Select policy.

(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (a), an issuer shall continue to make available for purchase any policy form or certificate form issued after January 1, 2001, that has been approved by the commissioner. A policy form or certificate form shall not be considered to be
 available for purchase unless the issuer has actively offered it for sale in the previous 12 months.

(A) An issuer may discontinue the availability of a policy form or certificate form if the issuer provides to the commissioner in writing its decision at least 60 days prior to discontinuing the availability of the form of the policy or certificate. After receipt of the notice by the commissioner, the issuer shall no longer offer for sale the policy form or certificate form in this state.

(B) An issuer that discontinues the availability of a policy form or certificate form pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not file for approval a new policy form or certificate form of the same type for the same standard Medicare supplement benefit plan as the discontinued form for a period of five years after the issuer provides notice to the commissioner of the discontinuance. The period of
 discontinuance may be reduced if the commissioner determines that a shorter period is appropriate.

(2) The sale or other transfer of Medicare supplement business to another issuer shall be considered a discontinuance for the purposes of this subdivision.

(3) A change in the rating structure or methodology shall be considered a discontinuance under paragraph (1) unless the issuer complies with the following requirements:

(A) The issuer provides an actuarial memorandum, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, describing the manner in which the revised rating methodology and resultant rates differ from the existing rating methodology and existing rates. The commissioner may approve the change if it is in the public interest.

(B) The issuer
 does not subsequently put into effect a change of rates or rating factors that would cause the percentage differential between the discontinued and subsequent rates as described in the actuarial memorandum to change. The commissioner may approve a change to the differential that is in the public interest. The commissioner may approve a change to the differential if it is in the public interest.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the experience of all policy forms or certificate forms of the same type in a standard Medicare supplement benefit plan shall be combined for purposes of the refund or credit calculation prescribed in Section 10192.14.

(2) Forms assumed under an assumption reinsurance agreement shall not be combined with the experience of other forms for purposes of the refund or credit calculation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 206, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.16.

(a) An issuer or other entity may provide commission or other compensation to an agent or other representative for the sale of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate only if the first year commission or other first year compensation is no more than 200 percent of the commission or other compensation paid for selling or servicing the policy or certificate in the second year or period. Every insurer shall file with the commissioner its commission structure or an explanation of the insurer’s plan to comply with this provision.

(b) The commission or other compensation provided in subsequent renewal years must be the same as that provided in the second year or period and must be provided for no fewer than five renewal years.

(c) No issuer or other entity shall provide compensation to its agents or other producers, and no agent or producer shall receive compensation, greater than the renewal compensation payable by the replacing issuer on renewal policies or certificates if an existing policy or certificate is replaced.

(d) For purposes of this section, “commission” or “compensation” includes pecuniary or nonpecuniary remuneration of any kind relating to the sale or renewal of the policy or certificate, including, but not limited to, bonuses, gifts, prizes, awards, and finders’ fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.165.

(a) (1) As prescribed in this chapter, the commissioner shall have the administrative authority to assess penalties against issuers, brokers, agents, and other entities engaged in the business of insurance or any other person or entity for violations of this article.

(2) Upon a showing of a
 violation of this article in any civil action, a court may also assess the penalties prescribed in this chapter.

(3) Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe or determines after a public hearing that any issuer, agent, broker, or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, has violated this article he or she shall make and serve upon the issuer, broker, or other person or entity a notice of hearing. The notice shall state the commissioner’s intent to assess the administrative penalties, the time and place of the hearing, and the conduct, condition, or ground upon which the commissioner is holding the hearing and assessing the penalties. The hearing shall occur within 30 days after the notice is served. Within 30 days after the hearing the commissioner shall issue an order specifying the amount of penalties to be paid. The penalties resulting from the hearing shall be paid to the Insurance Fund.

(4) The powers vested in the commissioner by this section shall be additional to any and all powers and remedies vested in the commissioner by law.

(b) (1) Any broker, agent, or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than an issuer, who violates this article is liable for administrative penalties of no less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation.

(2) Any broker, agent, other person, or other entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than an issuer, who engages in practices prohibited by this chapter a second or subsequent time or who commits a knowing violation of this article, is liable for administrative penalties of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation.

(3) Any issuer who violates this article is liable for administrative penalties of no less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation.

(4) Any issuer who violates this article with a frequency as to indicate a general business practice or commits a knowing violation of this article, is liable for administrative penalties of no less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and no more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(c) (1) Actions for injunctive relief, penalties in the amounts specified in subdivision (a), damages, restitution, and all other remedies provided for in law, may be brought in superior court by the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney on behalf of the people of the State of California.

(2) The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff who establishes a violation of this article.

(d) In addition to any other applicable penalties, the commissioner may require issuers, agents, brokers, or other persons or entities violating any provision of this article or regulations promulgated pursuant to this article, to cease marketing in this state any Medicare supplement policy or certificate or may require the issuer, agent, broker, or other person or entity to take such actions as are necessary to comply with the provisions of this article, or both.

(e) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates any provision of this article is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision
 (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(f) (1) The requirements and remedies provided by this article are in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

(2) If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.
